Washington statutes.
RCW 2.36.093

Selection of jurors—Length and number of terms—Time of service.

(1) At such time as the judge or judges of any court of any county shall deem that the public business requires a jury term to be held, the judge or judges shall direct that a jury panel be selected and summoned to serve for the ensuing jury term or terms.

(2) The court shall establish the length and number of jury terms in a consecutive twelve-month period, and shall establish the time of juror service consistent with the provisions of RCW 2.36.010.

[ 1992 c 93 s 3; 1988 c 188 s 8; 1973 2nd ex.s. c 13 s 2.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1988 c 188: See notes following RCW 2.36.010.